Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2247
Nebraska District Court Judges Association; created; duties.

The Nebraska District Court Judges Association is hereby created which shall consist of all the active judges of the district courts of this state and their successors in office. The association shall:

(1) Meet at least once during each calendar year;

(2) Select from its membership officers thereof; and

(3) Adopt such bylaws and rules as may be necessary or proper for the conduct of its meetings, the exercise of its powers, and the performance of its duties and delegate to one or more of its members such powers as the association deems necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 2.